Hawaii statutes.
§431:12-112 Underwriting standards.
Every plan of mass merchandising and all rules and standards applicable to mass
merchandising of insurance shall be subject to audit by the commissioner upon
written request to the insurer. No underwriting standard for risk selection
under a mass merchandising plan shall be more restrictive than the standards
used for insurance sold by methods other than mass merchandising. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next